Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 2. Recreation Rivers.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent in connection with the enactment of AS

41.23.400

—

41.23.510

, see sec. 1, ch. 122, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For parks, recreation, and public use, see 11 AAC, part 2.

Sec. 41.23.400.
Purposes.

The purpose of AS

41.23.400

—

41.23.510

is to establish as recreation rivers the land and water now owned by the state and the land and water acquired in the future by the state that lies within the recreation rivers and the river corridors described in AS

41.23.500

.

The primary purpose for the establishment of the six recreation rivers is the maintenance and enhancement of the land and water described in AS

41.23.500

for recreation.

The primary purposes for the management of the six recreation rivers are

the management, protection, and maintenance of the fish and wildlife populations and habitat on a sustained-yield basis;

continued recreation and economic use, including the uses described in (3) and (4) of this subsection, and enjoyment by the public and individuals of recreational activities that include hunting, fishing, trapping, camping, boating, hiking, snowmachining, skiing, dog mushing, and wildlife viewing, while ensuring the scenic and natural integrity of the recreation river;

multiple use management of upland activities within the recreation river corridor to ensure that mitigation measures to alleviate potential adverse effects on water quality and stream flow will take place; and

accommodation of access for resource uses, including recreation and tourism, within or adjacent to the river corridor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.200

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial use, see 11 AAC 9, art. 3.

Sec. 41.23.410.
Compatible activities.

The commissioner shall allow the following activities on a recreation river or within a recreation river corridor when they are compatible with AS

41.23.400

and consistent with a management plan adopted under AS

41.23.440

:

the use of aircraft, powerboats, snow machines, all-terrain vehicles, motorized transportation, and transportation by animal;

the sale and harvest of wood products under AS

41.23.470(b)

;

sand and gravel extraction under AS

41.23.470(b)

;

the construction and operation of recreation facilities; and

other uses permitted in the management plan required by AS

41.23.440

, including mining and mineral development.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.210

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial use, see 11 AAC 9, art. 3.

Sec. 41.23.420.
General management of recreation rivers and corridors.

The state-owned land and water within the area established as a recreation river under AS

41.23.500

, including the recreation river corridor, is assigned to the commissioner for management consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.400

.

The commissioner shall reserve to the state under AS

46.15.145

an instream flow or level for the water in the rivers described in AS

41.23.500

that is adequate to achieve the purposes of AS

41.23.400

.

The commissioner may regulate boating, if necessary, under the management plan adopted under AS

41.23.440

.

The provisions of AS

41.23.400

—

41.23.510

do not affect the authority of

the Department of Fish and Game, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, or the Big Game Commercial Services Board under AS 08.54, AS 16, or AS

41.99.010

; or

the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS 46.03.

The commissioner may not restrict the use of weapons, including firearms, within a recreation river and a recreation river corridor except in sites of high public use such as picnic areas, boat ramps, camping grounds, and parking areas when the commissioner determines that the use of weapons constitutes a threat to public safety. Except as provided in this subsection, the commissioner may not restrict fishing, hunting, or trapping within a recreation river and its recreation river corridor.

The authority of the commissioner under AS

41.23.400

—

41.23.510

ceases where the land and water established as a recreation river under AS

41.23.400

—

41.23.510

meets land and water that is not established as a recreation river.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988; am § 11 ch 37 SLA 1989; am § 11 ch 33 SLA 1996; am E.O. No. 106 § 6 (2003); am § 10 ch 31 SLA 2005; am § 41 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.220

.
Renumbered in 1988.

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in (d) of this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (d) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial use, see 11 AAC 9, art. 3.

Sec. 41.23.430.
Advisory board.

A 13-member Recreation Rivers Advisory Board is established. Board members serve without compensation and are not entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

. The governor shall appoint members representing

commercial fishing;

sport fishing;

sport hunting;

conservation;

subsistence;

forest products;

mining;

powerboat users;

recreationally-oriented commercial users;

other recreational users;

private property owners within the recreation river corridor;

the Matanuska-Susitna Borough Planning Commission from the membership of the planning commission; and

the mayor of the Matanuska-Susitna Borough or the designee of the mayor.

The commissioner shall consult with the advisory board in preparing, adopting, and revising the recreation river management plan and regulations affecting use and management of the recreation rivers.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.230

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.23.440.
Management plan.

The commissioner, in consultation with representatives of affected municipalities, shall prepare and adopt and may revise a management plan for each of the six recreation rivers and their recreation river corridors. In preparing or revising the plan, the commissioner and each affected municipality shall consult with the public and state agencies, including the commissioner of fish and game and the advisory board established under AS

41.23.430

. In preparation or revision of the plan, the commissioner shall comply with the notice requirements of AS

38.05.945

and provide written notice by first-class mail to private property owners in the recreation river corridors and shall hold at least two public hearings in municipalities and communities near the recreation river and the recreation river corridor. The management plan shall establish long-range guidelines and management practices consistent with AS

41.23.400

to

establish guidelines and restrictions, if necessary, for an activity occurring under AS

41.23.410

to implement the purposes of AS

41.23.400

;

protect, maintain, or enhance the fish and wildlife habitat and the free-flowing nature of the river;

identify special recreation values and manage the level of intensity and types of recreation uses;

designate management guidelines for development activities;

designate management guidelines for commercial recreation activities or development, including recreation services;

provide for necessary public services, such as transportation and utility corridors, crossing or fording corridors, public safety, and law enforcement;

allow reasonable access to public land and private inholdings, including municipal land that is offered for sale or lease, and to land beyond or adjacent to the recreation river and the recreation river corridor;

establish criteria and expedient timelines to review future proposed uses for compatibility with AS 41.23.400.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations necessary to implement the management plan. The commissioner may not adopt regulations before a management plan takes effect. The commissioner may designate employees of the department as peace officers to enforce the provisions of AS

41.23.400

—

41.23.510

.

A management plan proposed by the commissioner under (a) of this section shall be submitted to the legislature for review within the first 10 days of the first regular session of the legislature to convene after completion of the plan by the commissioner. The plan takes effect 100 days after submission of the plan to the legislature unless rejected by an act of the legislature.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.240

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For commercial use, see 11 AAC 9, art. 3.

For definitions, see 11 AAC 9, art. 4.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 122, SLA 1988 provides:
“Until a management plan has been adopted for a recreation river under AS

41.23.440(a)

, as enacted in sec. 2 of this Act, interim management of the recreation river shall be consistent with AS

41.23.400

.
Except for negotiated sales under AS

38.05.115

, the commissioner of natural resources may not dispose of timber or other resources within a recreation river corridor before the adoption of the management plan.
The commissioner of natural resources shall propose a management plan for each recreation river by the first 10 days of the Second Regular Session of the Eighteenth Alaska State Legislature.”

Sec. 41.23.450.
Management of municipal land.

If a municipality commits land for inclusion in a recreation river corridor described in AS

41.23.500

, the commissioner shall obtain the concurrence of the municipality to the management plan proposed under AS

41.23.440

as it applies to municipal land. The commissioner shall cooperate, at the request of a municipality, in planning for municipal land adjacent to a recreation river corridor. Municipal land not committed by a municipality for inclusion in a recreation river corridor is excluded from the operation of the management plan.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.250

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.23.460.
Acquisition of additional land.

The commissioner may acquire in the name of the state land that is adjacent to or located within the land described in AS

41.23.500

by purchase, lease, gift, or exchange for inclusion within a recreation river corridor.

The commissioner may not acquire land for inclusion in a recreation river corridor by eminent domain.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.260

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.23.470.
Application of public land laws.

The provisions of AS 38.04, AS 38.05, AS 38.35, and AS 38.95 apply to land described in AS

41.23.500

except to the extent that a provision of AS

41.23.400

—

41.23.510

is inconsistent.

The commissioner may conduct only a negotiated timber sale under AS

38.05.115

to provide for personal use, including house logs and firewood, or for a use incidental to the construction of access, or for habitat enhancement.

The commissioner may permit mining leasing under AS

38.05.205

on upland within a recreation river corridor if leasing is allowed under a management plan that has been adopted by the commissioner. The commissioner shall establish appropriate conditions for permits, operating plans, and leases to mitigate the effects of mineral development activities on the environment and to prevent to the extent practicable degradation of the recreation uses of the river.

To enhance public use and enjoyment of a recreation river corridor under a management plan adopted under AS

41.23.440

, the commissioner may provide for the construction and operation of commercial facilities such as lodges, campgrounds, and boat launches by

leasing land under AS

38.05.070

, including competitive leasing to a prequalified bidder; and

contracting for the construction and operation of a facility under AS 36.30 so long as the facility is not in competition with a private facility or enterprise.

The annual estimated balance in the account maintained by the commissioner of administration under AS

37.05.142

may be appropriated by the legislature to the department to carry out the purposes of AS

41.23.400

—

41.23.510

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988; am § 16 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 25 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.270

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial use, see 11 AAC 9, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (b) deleted “or material” following “only a negotiated timber”.

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent in connection with (b) of this section, enacted by sec. 2, ch. 122, SLA 1988 (SCS CSHB 93 (Fin)), see 1988 Senate Journal 3204.

Sec. 41.23.480.
Cooperative management agreements.

The commissioner may enter into a cooperative management agreement for the management of land and water described in AS

41.23.500

or of other adjacent land and water with a federal agency, a municipality, another agency of the state, or a private landowner.

The commissioner may transfer the management of a specific site within a recreation river corridor described in AS

41.23.500

to a state agency, a municipality, or a private entity to carry out a program authorized by law or to enhance the objectives of the management plan adopted under AS

41.23.440

.

The commissioner may not manage a recreation river corridor described in AS

41.23.500

as a unit of the state park system or as a game refuge, game sanctuary, or a critical habitat. The commissioner may assign management of a recreation facility or site such as a campground or a boat launch to the division of parks.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.280

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.23.490.
Limitation on establishment.

State-owned land and water may be established as a recreation river corridor only by the legislature.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.23.290.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.23.500.
Establishment of recreation rivers and recreation river corridors.

Subject to valid existing rights, the state-owned land and water and all land and water acquired by the state in the future, including shore and submerged land that lies within the following described parcels, are established as recreation rivers and reserved as special purpose areas under
art. VIII, sec. 7, Constitution of the State of Alaska and shall be retained by the state and be managed under
AS

41.23.400

—

41.23.510

;

Alexander Creek State Recreation River

Township 16 North, Range 7 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 7 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Kroto Creek and Moose Creek State Recreation River

Township 19 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 22 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 23 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 23 North, Range 7 West, Seward Meridian

Township 24 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 24 North, Range 7 West, Seward Meridian

Township 24 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 25 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 25 North, Range 7 West, Seward Meridian

Township 25 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 26 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 26 North, Range 7 West, Seward Meridian

Township 27 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 27 North, Range 7 West, Seward Meridian

Township 27 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 28 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Lake Creek State Recreation River

Township 21 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Township 22 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Township 23 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Township 24 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Township 24 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 25 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 25 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 26 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 26 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 27 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 27 North, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Township 28 North, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Little Susitna State Recreation River: the water column of the main stream of the Little Susitna River from mean high water mark to mean high water mark, from the point at which the river crosses the section line dividing Sections 23 and 26 in Township 19 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian downstream to the point at which the river crosses the section line between Sections 15 and 22 in Township 16 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian; the water column of Lake Creek from mean high water mark to mean high water mark, from the point at which the creek crosses the section line dividing Sections 10 and 11, Township 18 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian downstream to the confluence with the Little Susitna River; and

Township 16 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Talachulitna State Recreation River

Township 16 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Talkeetna State Recreation River: the water column of the Talkeetna River from mean high water mark to mean high water mark from the point at which it crosses the line dividing Townships 28 and 29 North, Seward Meridian, downstream to its confluence with the Susitna River; the water column of Chunilna Creek from mean high water mark to mean high water mark from the point at which it crosses the line dividing Townships 27 and 28 North, Seward Meridian, downstream to its confluence with the Talkeetna River; and

Township 26 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Township 26 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Township 26 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 27 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Township 27 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 27 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Township 27 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Township 27 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 28 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Township 28 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Sections 6 — 7

Sections 18 — 19

Section 6: Otter Lake, Weenie Lake, and the remaining state-owned land in the SW1/4

Section 7: Otter Lake and Tracts F-2 and F-3 of ASLS 79-147

Section 18: S1/2, W1/2NW1/4

Section 19

Sections 30 — 31

Section 32: W1/2

Section 1

Section 2: E1/2, N1/2NW1/4

Section 3: N1/2N1/2

Section 4: N1/2, N1/2SE1/4

Section 11: NE1/4, E1/2SE1/4

Section 12

Section 13: E1/2, E1/2NW1/4

Section 24: NE1/4, E1/2SE1/4

Section 4: W1/2

Section 5

Section 6: NE1/4

Section 8: N1/2, SE1/4

Section 9

Section 10: SW1/4

Section 14: W1/2SW1/4, SE1/4SW1/4

Section 15: W1/2, SE1/4, S1/2NE1/4

Section 16: N1/2, SE1/4

Section 22: N1/2, N1/2S1/2, S1/2SE1/4

Section 23: W1/2, W1/2SE1/4

Section 26: W1/2, W1/2E1/2, E1/2SE1/4

Section 27: E1/2NE1/4

Section 33: SW1/4, S1/2SE1/4

Section 34: S1/2S1/2

Section 36: W1/2

Section 19: W1/2, W1/2E1/2

Section 29: W1/2W1/2

Section 30

Section 31: E1/2, E1/2W1/2

Section 32

Sections 3 — 4

Sections 9 — 10

Section 13: S1/2

Section 14: S1/2

Sections 15 — 16

Section 22: N1/2

Section 23: N1/2

Section 24;

Section 35

Section 2: SW1/4

Section 3

Section 10: E1/2

Section 11

Section 14

Section 15: E1/2E1/2

Section 22: E1/2E1/2

Section 23

Section 25: that portion west of the easternmost bank of the Susitna River

Section 26

Section 27: E1/2E1/2

Section 34: NE1/4NE1/4

Section 35

Section 36: that portion west of the easternmost bank of the Susitna River

Section 4

Section 5: E1/2

Section 8: NE1/4, E1/2SE1/4

Section 9

Section 15: W1/2

Section 16

Section 21: E1/2, N1/2NW1/4, SE1/4NW1/4

Section 22: NW1/4, S1/2

Section 27

Section 34

Section 3

Section 9: E1/2SE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4

Section 10

Section 15: W1/2, W1/2NE1/4

Section 16

Section 20: E1/2

Section 21

Section 28

Section 29: E1/2

Section 32: E1/2E1/2, NW1/4NE1/4

Section 33

Section 34: SW1/4

Sections 4 — 5

Section 6: E1/2, E1/2W1/2

Sections 7 — 9

Sections 16 — 18

Sections 20 — 21

Section 27

Section 28: N1/2, SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 29: E1/2NE1/4

Section 33: N1/2NE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4

Section 34

Section 4

Section 7: W1/2

Section 9

Section 16

Section 17: SW1/4SW1/4

Sections 18 — 19

Section 20: W1/2NW1/4

Section 21

Section 28

Sections 30 — 31

Section 32: S1/2

Section 33

Section 1

Section 2: E1/2

Sections 12 — 13

Section 24

Section 25: N1/2, SE1/4

Section 36: N1/2NE1/4

Section 4: W1/2

Section 5

Section 6: NE1/4, E1/2SE1/4

Section 8: N1/2, SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 9

Section 15: SW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 16

Section 17: NE1/4, N1/2SE1/4

Section 21: E1/2, SE1/4SW1/4

Section 22: NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4

Section 28: E1/2W1/2, E1/2

Section 33

Section 6: S1/2, NW1/4

Section 7

Section 8: S1/2SW1/4

Section 16: W1/2, W1/2E1/2

Section 17

Section 18: N1/2N1/2, SE1/4NW1/4, S1/2NE1/4, N1/2SE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4

Section 19: NE1/4NE1/4

Section 20: N1/2

Section 21: W1/2, SE1/4, W1/2NE1/4

Section 27

Section 28: E1/2

Section 33: NE1/4NE1/4

Section 34: E1/2, E1/2W1/2, NW1/4NW1/4

Section 35: W1/2, SE1/4, S1/2NE1/4

Section 36: SW1/4

Section 1: E1/2

Section 12: NE1/4, E1/2SE1/4

Section 13: NE1/4NE1/4

Section 5

Section 8

Section 17

Section 18: SE1/4

Section 19: E1/2, E1/2W1/2

Section 20: W1/2W1/2

Section 29: W1/2W1/2

Section 30: E1/2, E1/2W1/2

Section 31: E1/2

Section 32: W1/2W1/2, SE1/4SW1/4

Section 5

Section 6: SE1/4, S1/2NE1/4

Section 7: E1/2, SW1/4, E1/2NW1/4

Section 8: NW1/4, W1/2SW1/4

Sections 18 — 19

Sections 30 — 31

Section 13: E1/2SE1/4

Section 24: E1/2NE1/4

Section 5

Section 8

Section 17: N1/2, SE1/4, N1/2SW1/4, SE1/4SW1/4

Section 19: SE1/4

Section 20: E1/2, SW1/4, S1/2NW1/4, NE1/4NW1/4

Section 29: E1/2, NW1/4

Section 30: S1/2, NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4

Section 31: E1/2NE1/4, that portion of NW1/4NE1/4 within retained easement (50´ each side of MHWM)

Section 32: Land within 150´ of MHWM

Section 4: W1/2

Section 5: E1/2, S1/2SW1/4

Section 7: SE1/4

Section 8

Section 9: NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4

Section 17

Section 18: E1/2

Section 19

Section 20: W1/2

Section 29: S1/2, NW1/4

Section 30

Section 31: NE1/4

Section 32

Section 4

Section 5: E1/2

Section 8: E1/2

Section 9

Section 16

Section 17: E1/2

Section 20: E1/2

Section 21

Section 28: W1/2

Section 29: E1/2

Section 32: E1/2

Section 33: W1/2

Section 7

Section 8: S1/2, NW1/4

Section 9: W1/2

Section 16

Section 17: N1/2, SE1/4

Section 20: E1/2

Section 21

Section 28: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 29: E1/2

Section 32: E1/2

Section 33: W1/2

Section 12: NE1/4

Section 32: S1/2SE1/4

Section 33: S1/2S1/2;

Section 3

Section 4: Excluding Tracts A, B, C and D

Section 9: N1/2 Excluding Tracts A and B

Section 10

Section 15

Section 4: NW1/4, S1/2

Section 5: N1/2, E1/2SE1/4

Section 9: N1/2, SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 10: W1/2SW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 15: W1/2

Section 16: E1/2, E1/2W1/2

Section 21: E1/2

Section 22: W1/2

Section 27: W1/2, W1/2SE1/4

Section 28: E1/2

Section 34

Section 3: W1/2W1/2

Section 4

Section 5: E1/2, E1/2SW1/4

Section 7: SE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 8: S1/2, NE1/4, S1/2NW1/4, NE1/4NW1/4

Section 9: N1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4

Section 17: W1/2, W1/2E1/2

Section 18: E1/2

Section 19: N1/2, SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 20: W1/2, SE1/4, S1/2NE1/4, NW1/4NE1/4

Section 29

Section 30: NE1/4, E1/2NW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4, SE1/4

Section 32

Section 33: S1/2SW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4

Section 28: S1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SE1/4

Section 29: NW1/4, S1/2

Section 30

Section 31: N1/2

Section 32: NW1/4, E1/2

Section 33

Section 34: SW1/4SW1/4

Section 3

Section 4: E1/2

Section 10

Section 11: W1/2, W1/2SE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4

Section 13: W1/2W1/2

Section 14

Section 15: NE1/4

Section 23: N1/2, SE1/4

Section 24: W1/2, S1/2SE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4

Section 25

Section 36: NE1/4, E1/2NW1/4

Sections 6 — 7

Section 8: S1/2, NW1/4

Section 16: W1/2

Section 17

Section 18: E1/2

Section 20: SE1/4, N1/2

Section 21

Section 22: W1/2

Section 25: SW1/4

Section 26: S1/2

Section 27

Section 28: E1/2, NW1/4

Sections 34 — 35

Section 36: W1/2

Section 1: E1/2

Section 31

Sections 3 — 4

Section 9: E1/2

Section 10

Section 14: W1/2

Section 15

Section 22: E1/2, E1/2NW1/4

Section 23

Section 25: S1/2, NW1/4

Section 26

Section 27: NE1/4

Section 35: NE1/4

Section 36

Section 6: SW1/4

Section 7

Section 8: SW1/4

Sections 17 — 18

Section 19: N1/2, SE1/4

Section 20

Section 21: SW1/4

Sections 28 — 29

Section 30: NE1/4

Section 32: E1/2

Section 33

Section 34: W1/2

Sections 1 — 3

Section 10: N1/2, SE1/4

Sections 11 — 14

Section 15: NE1/4

Section 23: NE1/4

Section 24: N1/2

Sections 1 — 5

Sections 8 — 12

Sections 13 — 17

Sections 21 — 24

Sections 25 — 28

Sections 33 — 36;

Section 3

Section 4: E1/2NE1/4

Section 10: E1/2, E1/2W1/2

Section 15: E1/2, E1/2W1/2

Section 4

Section 6: SW1/4

Section 7: W1/2, S1/2SW1/4

Section 8: E1/2, S1/2SW1/4

Section 17: NW1/4

Section 18: N1/2, N1/2SW1/4

Sections 12 — 15

Section 22

Section 23: N1/2N1/2, SW1/4NW1/4, W1/2SW1/4

Section 26: W1/2W1/2

Section 27

Section 34

Section 8: NW1/4, SW1/4NE1/4, S1/2NE1/4NE1/4

Section 15: N1/2NE1/4

Section 16: NW1/4, N1/2NE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4

Section 15: NW1/4, N1/2NE1/4, NW1/4SW1/4

Section 16: S1/2

Section 17: S1/2

Section 19: NW1/4, W1/2NE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 19

Section 20: SW1/4, W1/2SE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4, W1/2NW1/4

Section 28: N1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 29: NE1/4

Section 30

Section 11: SW1/4, SW1/4SE1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 13: S1/2, SW1/4NE1/4

Section 14

Section 24

Section 25: N1/2

Section 26

Section 27: S1/2

Section 33: S1/2, S1/2NE1/4

Section 34

Section 35: NW1/4, W1/2NE1/4;

Section 6: W1/2

Section 7: NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4

Section 1: E1/2, SW1/4

Section 2: S1/2, NW1/4

Section 3

Section 11: N1/2, N1/2S1/2

Section 12: N1/2, N1/2S1/2

Section 6: W1/2, W1/2SE1/4

Section 7

Sections 18 — 19

Sections 30 — 31

Section 1: E1/2E1/2

Section 3: W1/2

Sections 4 — 5

Section 6: S1/2

Sections 7 — 8

Section 9: N1/2, SE1/4

Section 10

Section 14: W1/2

Section 15

Section 17: NW1/4

Section 18: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 19: NW1/4NW1/4

Section 22

Section 23: W1/2

Section 25: E1/2E1/2

Section 26: W1/2

Section 27

Section 34

Section 35: W1/2

Section 7: S1/2

Section 12: S1/2

Section 13

Section 14: S1/2

Section 15: S1/2

Section 16: S1/2

Sections 17 — 18

Section 20: E1/2

Sections 21 — 23

Section 24: N1/2, N1/2S1/2

Section 9: S1/2

Section 10: S1/2

Section 11: S1/2

Section 12: S1/2

Sections 13 — 16

Section 24: N1/2

Section 18: SW1/4SW1/4

Section 19: NW1/4, S1/2NE1/4, E1/2SW1/4, SE1/4

Section 20: S1/2, NE1/4

Section 21

Section 22: W1/2W1/2

Section 26: W1/2SW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 27: S1/2, S1/2N1/2

Sections 28 — 29

Section 30: E1/2, E1/2W1/2

Section 31: NE1/4, S1/2NW1/4, NE1/4NW1/4, SW1/4, W1/2SE1/4

Section 33: NE1/4NE1/4

Section 34: N1/2NW1/4

Section 6: W1/2, W1/2E1/2, E1/2SE1/4

Section 7

Section 11: E1/2SE1/4

Section 12: SW1/4SW1/4

Section 13: NW1/4, E1/2SW1/4, SE1/4

Section 16: SW1/4

Sections 17 — 18

Section 19: NE1/4

Section 20: N1/2, SE1/4

Section 21: W1/2

Section 24: E1/2NE1/4

Section 28

Section 29: E1/2

Section 32: E1/2

Section 33

Section 36: E1/2SE1/4SE1/4SE1/4

Sections 1 — 2

Section 12: N1/2, SE1/4

Section 3: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 4: E1/2E1/2, W1/2SE1/4, SE1/4SW1/4

Section 9: E1/2, SW1/4, E1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 10: NW1/4

Section 15: W1/2SW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 16

Section 21

Section 22: W1/2W1/2, E1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SE1/4

Sections 27 — 28

Section 34

Section 35: S1/2, NW1/4

Section 18: W1/2

Section 19: W1/2

Section 1

Section 2: N1/2

Section 11: E1/2

Sections 12 — 13

Section 14: E1/2

Sections 23 — 24

Section 25: N1/2

Section 26

Section 27: E1/2

Section 34: S1/2, NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4

Section 35: NW1/4

Section 31: W1/2

Section 25: SW1/4, SW1/4SE1/4

Section 26: E1/2SE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4

Section 35: E1/2, SW1/4

Section 36;

Sections 1 — 2: north of the left bank of the Sheep River

Section 3: all land north of the left bank of the Talkeetna River and Tract B of ASLS 81-196

Section 4: all land north of the left bank of the Talkeetna River and Tract A of ASLS 81-196

Section 5: all land north of the left bank of the Talkeetna River and Tract C of ASLS 80-94

Section 6: all land north of the left bank of the Talkeetna River and Tract A of ASLS 80-84

Sections 1 — 3: exclusive of ASLS 79-149

Section 4: E1/2, SW1/4 exclusive of ASLS 79-149

Section 7: S1/2

Section 8: S1/2 exclusive of ASLS 79-149

Section 9: E1/2, E1/2W1/2

Section 17: that portion north of the left bank of the Talkeetna River

Section 18: exclusive of DOT 200642

Section 12: E1/2SE1/4

Section 13: E1/2, E1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4

Section 23: that portion northeast of the left bank of the Susitna River

Section 24: that portion east of the left bank of the Susitna River and west of the right bank of the main channel of the Talkeetna River (that channel of the river that runs diagonally through the NE1/4 and SW1/4 of Sec. 24)

Section 1

Section 2: S1/2, NE1/4, S1/2NW1/4

Section 3: SW1/2, S1/2N1/2

Section 4: SE1/4

Sections 7 — 10

Section 11: N1/2

Section 12: NW1/4

Section 15: NW1/4

Section 16: N1/2

Section 17: N1/2

Section 18: N1/2

Section 2: SW1/4

Section 3: S1/2

Section 4: S1/2

Section 5: SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 7: SE1/4

Sections 8 — 12

Section 13: N1/2

Section 14: N1/2NE1/4

Section 17

Section 18: E1/2, SW1/4

Section 19

Section 20: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 30: W1/2

Section 24: E1/2

Section 25

Section 26: SE1/4

Section 31: S1/2

Section 32: S1/2 exclusive of ASLS 79-149

Section 33: S1/2S1/2 exclusive of ASLS 79-149

Section 34: S1/2S1/2 exclusive of ASLS 79-149 and ASLS 76-138

Sections 35 — 36

Section 36: S1/2SE1/4 exclusive of ASLS 74-77 and ASLS 74-78

Section 5: NW1/4

Section 6

Section 36: SE1/4SE1/4

Section 2

Section 3: SE1/4

Section 9: SE1/4

Section 10

Section 11: NW1/4, W1/2NE1/4, W1/2SW1/4

Section 15: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 16: E1/2SW1/4

Section 20: SE1/4

Section 21

Section 22: NW1/4

Section 28: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 29: E1/2, SW1/4, SE1/4NW1/4

Section 31: SW1/4, E1/2

Section 32

Section 33: NW1/4.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 6 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.23.300.
Renumbered in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial use, see 11 AAC 9, art. 3.

For definitions, see 11 AAC 9, art. 4.

Sec. 41.23.510.
Definition.

In AS

41.23.400

—

41.23.510

,

“recreation river corridor” means the uplands within a recreation river established under AS

41.23.500

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.23.310.
Renumbered in 1988.
As enacted, this section included a definition of “commissioner.” Because of the enactment of an identical definition of that term for AS 41 by sec. 37, ch. 85, SLA 1988, the definition enacted by ch. 122 was not codified in 1988.
See AS

41.99.900

.